Massachusetts, session 194th, S2966.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) Pursuant to chapter 65 of the acts of 2010 and notwithstanding section 5A of chapter 3 
of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of 
conservation and recreation, may lease or enter into other agreements with The Riverside Boat 
Club of Cambridge in the city of Cambridge for a parcel of land, reconfigured from that shown 
in existing records of the department of conservation and recreation, for the continued operation 
of its historical rowing program and boathouse. The reconfigured parcel of land is more 
particularly described on a plan of land on file with the department, entitled “Plan Showing 
Reoriented Boundary for Riverside Boat Club of Cambridge”, dated December 12, 2022, 
including the adjacent water sheet currently being used and appurtenant rights of access from 
adjoining public roadways. 
(b) Any such lease or other agreement shall require that, in addition to consideration for 
the lease or other agreement pursuant to section 2 of chapter 65 of the acts of 2010, The 

of 2 14 Riverside Boat Club of Cambridge in the city of Cambridge shall maintain the area from 
Memorial drive to the boathouse, as depicted on a plan on file with the department of 
conservation and recreation, entitled “Plan Showing Maintenance Parcel for Riverside Boat Club 
of Cambridge” dated July 22, 2025.  
(c) The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may: (i) make minor 
revisions to the plan pursuant to subsection (a) and shall file the final plan with the Middlesex 
southern district registry of deeds; and (ii) execute any leases or other agreements consistent with 
chapter 65 of the acts of 2010.